lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/noun-suffixing/noun-derivSuffix_te.txt
!=====================================================
LEXICON NounPostbaseVI
!  noun-elaborating [NN] and verbalizing [NV] suffixes
!  when suffixing to noun roots that end in -te
!=====================================================

0:0  NounInflVI;

^~sf–ghhaleg(N→XCLM):^ghhalek     #;             ! how N! (exclamation)
^–lqusigh(N→PTCL):^lqusiq         #;             ! all N; throughout the N; since last N; big N
^+tuumagh*(N→QUANTQUAL):^tuumagh  QuantQualInfl; ! together with one's Ns

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! (N→N) postbases
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!--------------------------
! adjectival qualification
!    [ Miyaoka 20.1.1 ]
!--------------------------
^–ghllag(N→N):^ghllag                    NounPostbaseII;  ! big N; large N; lots of N
^–ghrugllag(N→N):^ghrugllag              NounPostbaseII;  ! big N; large N
^–ghnaggagh*(N→N):^ghnaggagh             NounPostbaseIV;  ! big N
^–ghrukutaaghllag(N→N):^ghrukutaaghllag  NounPostbaseII;  ! huge N; gigantic N
^–ghrukutaagh(N→N):^ghrukutaagh          NounPostbaseV;   ! big N; large N; huge N

^–ngeltagh(N→N):^ngelta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^–ngertagh(N→N):^ngerta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^–ngestagh(N→N):^ngesta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^–sluvegagh(N→N):^sluvega%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII; ! little N
^–sngwaaghagh(N→N):^sngwaagha%{g%}h      NounPostbaseIII; ! tiny N; very small N; very little N
^–squgh(N→N):^squ%{g%}h                  NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^@kaghagh(N→N):^%{.at.%}kagha%{g%}h      NounPostbaseIII; ! small N
^–squghhagh*(N→N):^squghhagh             NounPostbaseIV;  ! very small N; very little N; tiny N


^–lghute(N→N):^lghu%{t%}e                NounPostbaseVI;   ! lots of N; a number of N; several N; a group of N
^+yage(N→N):^yage                        NounPostbaseVIII; ! multitude of N; abundance of N; lots of N
^–msuggagh*(N→N):^msuggagh               NounPostbaseIV;   ! no N; virtually no N

^~%:(ng)inagh*(N→N):^%{.f.%}nginagh      NounPostbaseIV;  ! only N; just N; exactly N
^–raaghinagh*(N→N):^raaghinagh           NounPostbaseIV;  ! nothing but N; just N; only N
^–staghhiinagh*(N→N):^staghhiinagh       NounPostbaseIV;  ! only N; each one an N 

^–pig(N→N):^pig                          NounPostbaseII;  ! real N; genuine N; authentic N; old-fashioned N

^~–(ghw/ngw/w)aagh(N→N):^%{.f.%}ngwaagh  NounPostbaseV;   ! imitation N; artificial N; model N; toy N; pretend N; little bit of N or little thing like N; thing like N

^–llaag(N→N):^llaag                      NounPostbaseII;  ! crude N; clumsy N; bad N
^+llug(N→N):^llug                        NounPostbaseII;  ! poor quality N; bad N; undesirable N; N not in its ideal state
^–llug(N→N):^llug                        NounPostbaseII;  ! poor quality N; bad N; undesirable N; N not in its ideal state
^–lug(N→N):^lug                          NounPostbaseII;  ! old (in age) N
^–peragh(N→N):^pera%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; makeshift N; not quite correct N
^–llegagh*(N→N):^llegagh                 NounPostbaseIV;  ! crudely made N 
^–vyiigh(N→N):^vyiigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! crude N; makeshift N
^–vyiigh(N→N):^vyiigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! crude N; makeshift N
^–vziigh(N→N):^vziigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! crude N; makeshift N
^–vziigh(N→N):^vziigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! crude N; makeshift N

^~–kaghqagh(N→N):^%{.f.%}kaghqa%{g%}h    NounPostbaseIII; ! something to be used as N; future N

^+raghagh(N→N):^ragha%{g%}h              NounPostbaseIII; ! brand new N
^+raaghagh(N→N):^raagha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! new N
^~–kenghhagh*(N→N):^%{.f.%}kenghhagh     NounPostbaseIV;  ! newly made or newly acquired N
^–raagh(N→N):^raagh                      NounPostbaseV;   ! new-fangled N (as opposed to traditional style N); modern N

!--------------------
!     belonging 
! [ Miyaoka 20.1.2 ]
!--------------------
^+tagh(N→N):^ta%{g%}h                    NounPostbaseIII; ! the N part of something; thing of N; acquired N; caught N
^–linghagh*(N→N):^linghagh               NounPostbaseIV;  ! thing of N
^–qinghagh(N→N):^qingha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! thing of N

^~fmii(N→N):^%{.f.%}mii                  NounPostbaseI;   ! resident of N; inhabitant of N
^~sf-w%:(e)nkut(N→N):^nkut               Enclitic;        ! N and company (or family)
^~sf-w%:(e)nkuk(N→N):^nkuk               Enclitic;        ! N and partner (or spouse)

^~–kegtagh(N→N):^%{.f.%}kegta%{g%}h      NounPostbaseIII; ! one with good N
^–llgagh(N→N):^llga%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! one with small N; little one with N
^~f(p/v)allugh(N→N):^%{.f.%}vallu%{g%}h  NounPostbaseIII; ! one with big N; mostly N
^–squllgagh(N→N):^squllga%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII; ! one with small N
^–lgute(N→N):^lgu%{t%}e                  NounPostbaseVI;  ! one with the same N
^–leg(N→N):^leg                          NounPostbaseVII; ! one having N; one with N
^+tuqagh(N→N):^tuqa%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! one that has lots of N
^–tuqagh(N→N):^tuqa%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! one that has lots of N

^–kuvinghagh(N→N):^kuvingha%{g%}h        NounPostbaseIII; ! remains of N
^+kwaagh(N→N):^kwaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! leftover N

^–mleghagh(N→N):^mlegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N 
^–mreghagh(N→N):^mregha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–mzeghagh(N→N):^mzegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vleghagh(N→N):^vlegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vreghagh(N→N):^vregha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vzeghagh(N→N):^vzegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^~fngiighhagh*(N→N):^%{.f.%}ngiighhagh   NounPostbaseIV;  ! little N; small N; bit of N
^–mlaagh(N→N):^mlaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–mraagh(N→N):^mraagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–mzaagh(N→N):^mzaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vlaagh(N→N):^vlaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vraagh(N→N):^vraagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vzaagh(N→N):^vzaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N

^+ni(N→N):^ni                            NounPostbaseI;   ! the smell of N; the odor of N; the taste of N
^–krag(N→N):^krag                        NounPostbaseII;  ! fancy piece of of N

!------------------
!   associative 
! [ Miyaoka 20.2 ]
!------------------
^–perug(N→N):^perug                      NounPostbaseII;  ! one like N
^+raag(N→N):^raag                        NounPostbaseII;  ! thing like N
^–msiigh(N→N):^msiigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! something like N
^–siigh(N→N):^siigh                      NounPostbaseV;   ! something like N
^–qragh(N→N):^qra%{g%}h                  NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; thing like N

!------------------
!  dishonorifics 
! [ Miyaoka 20.3 ]
!------------------
^+lluggagh(N→N):^llugga%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! dear little meek N
^–lluggagh(N→N):^llugga%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! dear little meek N
^–lugpigagh(N→N):^lugpiga%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII; ! fine old N
^–qrug(N→N):^qrug                        NounPostbaseII;  ! good old N; bad old N (paradoxically); troublesome N
^–ghrug(N→N):^ghrug                      NounPostbaseII;  ! big old N; poor old N
^–ghrupag(N→N):^ghrupag                  NounPostbaseII;  ! darned old N
^–rraag(N→N):^rraag                      NounPostbaseII;  ! crude N; clumsy N; bad N; shabby N; discarded N
^–penaagh(N→N):^penaagh                  NounPostbaseV;   ! homely N; shabby N; dilapidated N; ugly N

!---------------
! miscellaneous
!---------------
^–lghutagh(N→N):^lghuta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! place for N; container for N
^–perewaagh(N→N):^perewaagh              NounPostbaseV;   ! all, only or totally N
^–pestaagh(N→N):^pestaagh                NounPostbaseV;   ! truly N

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! (N→V) postbases
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^–ghqu(N→V):^ghqu                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to go to get N or to get something from N
^––ii(N→V):^%{.mm.%}ii                         VerbPostbaseI;   ! to cut up N; to butcher N; to prepare N 
^–lgu(N→V):^lgu                                VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have an Nor have N-s; to possess N
^~%:(ng)u(N→V):^%{.f.%}ngu                     VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be N; is N; for there to be N (weather condition)
^–pigu(N→V):^pigu                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be very much an N
^+qu(N→V):^qu                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to hunt N; to hunt with (using) N
^+si(N→V):^si                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to work on or with N; to acquire lots of N; to get lots of N
^+ti(N→V):^ti                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to speak the language of N
^+tu(N→V):^tu                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have a lot of N 
^–tu(N→V):^tu                                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have a lot of N
^+tulli(N→V):^tulli                            VerbPostbaseI;   ! for it to be getting feasible to use N 
^+tutka(N→V):^tutka                            VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have N to an indicated degree
^––iqe(N→V):^%{.mm.%}iqe                       VerbPostbaseII;  ! to deal with N; to work with N; to have pain in one's N; to have trouble with one's N;
^~–ke(N→V):^%{.f.%}ke                          VerbPostbaseII;  ! have as one's N; object is subject's N; have N
^–liqe(N→V):^liqe                              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to deal with N; to work with N; to have pain in one's N; to have trouble with one's N
^+lliqe(N→V):^lliqe                            VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble with one's N
^–lliqe(N→V):^lliqe                            VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble with one's N
^–nge(N→V):^nge                                VerbPostbaseII;  ! to acquire N; to get N (permanently); to obtain N (permanently); to catch N (game)
^+te(N→V):^%{t%}e                              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to go to N; to catch N; to obtain N; to spend N (time)
^–ghraag(N→V):^ghraag                          VerbPostbaseIII; ! to be somewhat like N
^–ghrug(N→V):^ghrug                            VerbPostbaseIII; ! big old one V-s 
^–lipag(N→V):^lipag                            VerbPostbaseIII; ! to put in too much N
^~fmig(N→V):^%{.f.%}mig                        VerbPostbaseIII; ! to hold in one's N; to put in one's N
^~%:(ng)isag(N→V):^%{.f.%}ngisag               VerbPostbaseIII; ! to lack N; to need N
^~%:(ng)isug(N→V):^%{.f.%}ngisug               VerbPostbaseIII; ! to have insufficient N
^+tupag(N→V):^tupag                            VerbPostbaseIII; ! to eat or use too much N
^+yag(N→V):^yag                                VerbPostbaseIII; ! for the number of N to increase
^@~fyug(N→V):^%{.at.%}yug                      VerbPostbaseIII; ! to want some N
^––igh(N→V):^%{.mm.%}igh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! provide with N
^––iigh(N→V):^%{.mm.%}iigh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to fix N; to make N; to prepare N; to cook N
^~fiiraagh(N→V):^%{.f.%}iiraagh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to pretend by using N
^–lgigh(N→V):^lgigh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to travel using N
^–ligh(N→V):^ligh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to provide with N; to put N in
^–liigh(N→V):^liigh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to fix N; to make N; to prepare N; to cook N
^~fmiigh(N→V):^%{.f.%}miigh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to hold in one's N; to put in one's N
